src/pp-kom-lex.txt
! The Komi postposition

LEXICON PP ! These are the indeclieable ones 
+Po: # ;

LEXICON PPX ! These are the ones declined for case
# ;
!+Po: #; ! Nominative
!+Po+Ine: #;
!+Po+Ela: #;
!+Po+Ill: #;
!+Po+Pro: #;
!+Po+Egr: #;
!+Po+Ter: #;
!+Po+Apr: #;

LEXICON Postposition
PP ;
PPX ;
